src/fst/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON PropZ1VZmorf !type Inu:IT
                           +Prop+Abs+Sg:%>-             indholds-K   ;
                   +Err/Sub+Prop+Abs+Sg:%>-i             indholds-K   ;
                           +Prop+Abs+Sg:                 #            ;
                +Prop+Abs+Sg+3SgPoss:%>-a             Krestr       ;
        +Err/Sub+Prop+Abs+Sg+3SgPoss:%>-ia            Krestr       ;
                +Prop+Abs+Sg+3PlPoss:%>-at            Krestr       ;
        +Err/Sub+Prop+Abs+Sg+3PlPoss:%>-iat           Krestr       ;
                             +Prop+Rel+Sg:%>-p             Krestr       ;
                   +Err/Sub+Prop+Rel+Sg:%>-ip            Krestr       ;
                +Prop+Rel+Sg+3SgPoss:%>-ata           Krestr       ;
        +Err/Sub+Prop+Rel+Sg+3SgPoss:%>-iata          Krestr       ;
                +Prop+Rel+Sg+3PlPoss:%>-ata           Krestr       ;
        +Err/Sub+Prop+Rel+Sg+3PlPoss:%>-iata          Krestr       ;
                           +Prop+Lok+Sg:%>-mi            LokVb        ;
                   +Err/Sub+Prop+Lok+Sg:%>-imi           LokVb        ;
                +Prop+Lok+Sg+3SgPoss:%>-ani           LokVb        ;
        +Err/Sub+Prop+Lok+Sg+3SgPoss:%>-iani          LokVb        ;
                +Prop+Lok+Sg+3PlPoss:%>-anni          LokVb        ;
        +Err/Sub+Prop+Lok+Sg+3PlPoss:%>-ianni         LokVb        ;
                           +Prop+Ins+Sg:%>-mik           Krestr       ;
                   +Err/Sub+Prop+Ins+Sg:%>-imik          Krestr       ;
                           +Prop+Trm+Sg:%>-mut           TrmVb        ;
                   +Err/Sub+Prop+Trm+Sg:%>-imut          TrmVb        ;
                +Prop+Trm+Sg+3SgPoss:%>-anut          TrmVb        ;
        +Err/Sub+Prop+Trm+Sg+3SgPoss:%>-ianut         TrmVb        ;
                +Prop+Trm+Sg+3PlPoss:%>-annut         TrmVb        ;
        +Err/Sub+Prop+Trm+Sg+3PlPoss:%>-iannut        TrmVb        ;
                           +Prop+Abl+Sg:%>-mit           AblVb        ;
                   +Err/Sub+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>-imit          AblVb        ;
                           +Prop+Abl+Sg:%>-miit          Krestr       ;
                   +Err/Sub+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>-imiit         Krestr       ;
                           +Prop+Abl+Sg:%>-minngaannit   AblVb        ;
                   +Err/Sub+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>-iminngaannit  AblVb        ;
                +Prop+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss:%>-anit          AblVb        ;
        +Err/Sub+Prop+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss:%>-ianit         AblVb        ;
                +Prop+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss:%>-annit         AblVb        ;
        +Err/Sub+Prop+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss:%>-iannit        AblVb        ;
                           +Prop+Aeq+Sg:%>-tut           AeqVb       ;
                   +Err/Sub+Prop+Aeq+Sg:%>-itut          AeqVb       ;
                           +Prop+Via+Sg:%>-kkut          ViaVb       ;
                   +Err/Sub+Prop+Via+Sg:%>-ikkut         ViaVb       ;
                      +Prop+U+Der/nv:%>-u             IV_voq       ;
              +Prop+U+Der/nv+Err/Sub:%>-iu            IV_voq       ;
              +Prop+U+Der/nv+Err/Sub:%>-ju            IV_voq       ;
              +Prop+KKUT@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn:%>-kkut@U.Num.Pl@ ZPropKKUTZ ;
+Prop+KKUT+Der/nn+MIU@C.Num@+Der/nn:%>-kkormiu@C.Num@ tp ;
               +Prop+KKUUTAAR+Der/nv:%>-kkuutaar      flex-iv      ;
       +Prop+KKUUTAAR+Der/nv+Err/Sub:%>-ikkuutaar     flex-iv      ;
               +Prop+KKUUTAAR+Der/nv:%>-kkuutaar      flex-tv      ;
       +Prop+KKUUTAAR+Der/nv+Err/Sub:%>-ikkuutaar     flex-tv      ;
               +Prop+KKUUTAAT+Der/nn:%>-kkuutaat      tptmorf      ;
       +Prop+KKUUTAAT+Der/nn+Err/Sub:%>-ikkuutaat     tptmorf      ;
                    +Prop+LIR+Der/nv:%>-ler           HTR_ir_GAQ_i ;
            +Prop+LIR+Der/nv+Err/Sub:%>-iler          HTR_ir_GAQ_i ;
               +Prop+LLUINNAQ+Der/nv:%>-lluinnaq        tup-         ;
               +Prop+LLUINNAQ+Der/nv:%>-rluinnaq      tup-         ;
 +Prop+LLUINNAQ+Der/nv+NGAJAK+Der/nv:%>-rluinnangajak tup-         ;
                 +Prop+NGAJAK+Der/nn:%>-ngajak        tup-         ;
         +Prop+NGAJAK+Der/nn+Err/Sub:%>-ingajak       tup-         ;
                  +Prop+NNGUR+Der/nv:%>-nngor         IV_r         ;
          +Prop+NNGUR+Der/nv+Err/Sub:%>-inngor        IV_r         ;
                  +Prop+NNGUR+Der/nv:%>-nngor         TV           ;
          +Prop+NNGUR+Der/nv+Err/Sub:%>-inngor        TV           ;
                    +Prop+QAR+Der/nv:%>-qar           IV_voq       ;
            +Prop+QAR+Der/nv+Err/Sub:%>-eqar          IV_voq       ;
                      +Prop+R+Der/nv:%>-r             XIirXmorf    ;
              +Prop+R+Der/nv+Err/Sub:%>-er            XIirXmorf    ;
                   +Prop+RAAR+Der/nv:%>-raar          IV_r         ;
           +Prop+RAAR+Der/nv+Err/Sub:%>-eraar         IV_r         ;
                   +Prop+RIAR+Der/nv:%>-riar          IV_r         ;
           +Prop+RIAR+Der/nv+Err/Sub:%>-eriar         IV_r         ;
                   +Prop+RIAR+Der/nv:%>-riar          TV           ;
           +Prop+RIAR+Der/nv+Err/Sub:%>-eriar         TV           ;
                  +Prop+RIAAT+Der/nn:%>-riaat         tptmorf      ;
          +Prop+RIAAT+Der/nn+Err/Sub:%>-eriaat        tptmorf      ;
                +Prop+VVAARIK+Der/nn:%>-ffaarik       tup-         ;
        +Prop+VVAARIK+Der/nn+Err/Sub:%>-iffaarik      tup-         ;
