src/fst/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON ateq
GiellaLT PropZ1VZmorf ;
Inu%:IT PropZ1VZmorf ;
Inu%:it+Err/Sub:Inu%:it PropZ1VZmorf ;
